Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.710

Sale or exchange of tree seedling stock and tree seed—Provision of stock or seed to local governments or nonprofit organizations.

The department is authorized to sell to or exchange with persons intending to restock forest areas, tree seedling stock and tree seed produced at the state nursery.

The department may provide at cost, stock or seed to local governments or nonprofit organizations for urban tree planting programs consistent with the *community and urban forestry program.

[ 1993 c 204 s 7; 1988 c 128 s 35; 1947 c 67 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5823-40. Formerly RCW 76.12.160.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 209, Laws of 2021 changed the name of the program in chapter 76.15 RCW from "community and urban forestry" to "urban forest management plan."

Findings—1993 c 204: See note following RCW 35.92.390.